apertium-ckb.ckb.dix
    <pardef n="دەریا__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>نی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکەی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ییەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکانی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>نە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

      <e lm="ئاغا"><i>ئاغا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئاگا"><i>ئاگا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئاڵا"><i>ئاڵا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئامۆزا"><i>ئامۆزا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئامۆژگا"><i>ئامۆژگا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئاوهەوا"><i>ئاوهەوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەژدیها"><i>ئەژدیها</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئیمزا"><i>ئیمزا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="با"><i>با</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="بارەگا"><i>بارەگا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="باڵا"><i>باڵا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="برا"><i>برا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="برازا"><i>برازا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="بڕوا"><i>بڕوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="بۆمبا"><i>بۆمبا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="بەڵا"><i>بەڵا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="بەنا"><i>بەنا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پارێزگا"><i>پارێزگا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پاشا"><i>پاشا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پۆڵا"><i>پۆڵا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پوورزا"><i>پوورزا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="تا"><i>تا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="تارا"><i>تارا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ترۆمپا"><i>ترۆمپا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="تکا"><i>تکا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="توانا"><i>توانا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="تەقەلا"><i>تەقەلا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="تەماشا"><i>تەماشا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="جانتا"><i>جانتا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="جەزا"><i>جەزا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="چیا"><i>چیا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="خوا"><i>خوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="خورما"><i>خورما</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="خەتا"><i>خەتا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دارەخورما"><i>دارەخورما</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دنیا"><i>دنیا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دوعا"><i>دوعا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕا"><i>ڕا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="زانا"><i>زانا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="زوڕنا"><i>زوڕنا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="سزا"><i>سزا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="سەرما"><i>سەرما</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="سینەما"><i>سینەما</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="شا"><i>شا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="شارەزا"><i>شارەزا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="فاسۆلیا"><i>فاسۆلیا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کا"><i>کا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کارەبا"><i>کارەبا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کا"><i>کا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="گەرما"><i>گەرما</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="گیا"><i>گیا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="لەرزوتا"><i>لەرزوتا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="مانا"><i>مانا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="مقەبا"><i>مقەبا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="مەرحەبا"><i>مەرحەبا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="نانەوا"><i>نانەوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="وەستا"><i>وەستا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="هەرا"><i>هەرا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="هیوا"><i>هیوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="مینا"><i>مینا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="سەما"><i>سەما</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="نانەوا"><i>نانەوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="زاوا"><i>زاوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="برازا"><i>برازا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دادگا"><i>دادگا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="تووتیا"><i>تووتیا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="سەدا"><i>سەدا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="جۆگا"><i>جۆگا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پۆلا"><i>پۆلا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="چوارلا"><i>چوارلا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="فیزیا"><i>فیزیا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دوونیا"><i>دوونیا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="گیا"><i>گیا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="سەیرانگا"><i>سەیرانگا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="داوا"><i>داوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کزەبا"><i>کزەبا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="هێزی کارەبا"><i>هێزی<b/>کارەبا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="گەلا"><i>گەلا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕۆژاوا"><i>ڕۆژاوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="گۆشتی مانگا"><i>گۆشتی<b/>مانگا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="قۆری چا"><i>قۆری<b/>چا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="سەرما"><i>سەرما</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کۆمپانیا"><i>کۆمپانیا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="مامۆستا"><i>مامۆستا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="سوپا"><i>سوپا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="خوا"><i>خوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕێگا"><i>ڕێگا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="قەزا"><i>قەزا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="مانا"><i>مانا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="رۆژاوا"><i>رۆژاوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="مامۆستا"><i>مامۆستا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئالمانیا"><i>ئالمانیا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="خوا"><i>خوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕۆژئاوا"><i>ڕۆژئاوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئێستا"><i>ئێستا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="مۆسیقا"><i>مۆسیقا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="زانا"><i>زانا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="قەزا"><i>قەزا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="جێگا"><i>جێگا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پارێزگا"><i>پارێزگا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="قەڵا"><i>قەڵا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="یاریگا"><i>یاریگا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ھێما"><i>ھێما</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="جوگرافیا"><i>جوگرافیا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="خودا"><i>خودا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="هێما"><i>هێما</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پاپا"><i>پاپا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕێگا"><i>ڕێگا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="سەرما"><i>سەرما</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پەیمانگا"><i>پەیمانگا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="چیا"><i>چیا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="واتا"><i>واتا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="تێسلا"><i>تێسلا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="بڕوا"><i>بڕوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="بنەما"><i>بنەما</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کۆمپانیا"><i>کۆمپانیا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕۆژئاوا"><i>ڕۆژئاوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕەوا"><i>ڕەوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دەزگا"><i>دەزگا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="چا"><i>چا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="سەرەتا"><i>سەرەتا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕۆخی دەریا"><i>ڕۆخی<b/>دەریا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="داتا"><i>داتا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="سەرەتا"><i>سەرەتا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کەنار دەریا"><i>کەنار<b/>دەریا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ساوا"><i>ساوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پلەی گەرما"><i>پلەی گەرما</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="شیزۆفرنیا"><i>شیزۆفرنیا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پەسا"><i>پەسا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کارەبا"><i>کارەبا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ھەوا"><i>ھەوا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="گەرما"><i>گەرما</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دەرگا"><i>دەرگا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="گا"><i>گا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="موسیقا"><i>موسیقا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="یاسا"><i>یاسا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="برا"><i>برا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پا"><i>پا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کارەبا"><i>کارەبا</i><par n="دەریا__n"/></e>
